Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4079.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Community-based service provider” means a person that provides services to stu-
dents at a school as a contractor, an agent or a volunteer.
(b) “Federal immigration authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 180.805.
(c) “Immigration enforcement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.822.
(d) “School district” includes a school district, an education service district and a public
charter school.
(e) “School district board” includes a school district board, the board of directors of an
education service district and the governing body of a public charter school.
(f) “School property” means any real property owned or controlled by or on behalf of a
school district that is accessed by students of the school district on a regular basis, as de-
termined by the school district board.
(2) Each school district board shall adopt a policy for providing notice when a federal
immigration authority is confirmed to have entered school property for immigration
enforcement. The policy must be consistent with applicable model policies published by the
Attorney General as provided by ORS 180.810.
(3) The policy adopted under this section must:
(a) Identify at least one administrator for the school district, or at least one designee
of the administrator, who shall be designated to:
(A) Confirm that a federal immigration authority has entered school property for immi-
gration enforcement; and
(B) Provide notice when a federal immigration authority is confirmed to have entered
school property for immigration enforcement.
(b) Require that, unless otherwise prohibited by law or court order, reasonable efforts
are made to provide notice to a student, or to the parent or guardian of a student, when the
school district has provided information related to the student to a federal immigration au-
thority.
Enrolled House Bill 4079 (HB 4079-A) Page 1

(c) Identify which grades of students will receive a notice under this section.
(d) Provide a process by which a community-based service provider may elect to receive
notices under paragraph (e) of this subsection.
(e) Require that notice that a federal immigration authority is confirmed to be present
on school property for immigration enforcement is provided to:
(A) Students who attend the school where the federal immigration authority is confirmed
to be on school property for immigration enforcement and who are in grades identified in
paragraph (c) of this subsection;
(B) The parents or guardians of students attending the school where the federal immi-
gration authority is confirmed to be on school property for immigration enforcement;
(C) Employees of the school where the federal immigration authority is confirmed to be
on school property for immigration enforcement; and
(D) Community-based service providers that have elected to receive notice when a federal
immigration authority is confirmed to be on school property for immigration enforcement.
(f) Specify the contents and delivery requirements of the notice required under paragraph
(e) of this subsection, including the requirements that the notice:
(A) Must include at least the following information:
(i) The general location of the federal immigration authority; and
(ii) Whether classes or school operations are affected by the presence of the federal im-
migration authority.
(B) May not disclose any of the following information:
(i) Personally identifiable information; or
(ii) Other information that may not be legally disclosed.
(C) May not disclose information when the disclosure:
(i) May threaten the health or safety of the students or employees of the school district;
or
(ii) Is prohibited by a court order.
(D) Must be provided as expediently as possible by existing methods used for providing
electronic communications.
(g) Ensure compliance with ORS 180.805 and 181A.826 and any policies adopted based on
a model policy published as provided by ORS 180.810.
(h) Require that training is provided to any person identified or designated as provided
by paragraph (a) of this subsection. The training must, at a minimum:
(A) Include information on the requirements of this section and on any applicable model
policies published by the Attorney General under ORS 180.810; and
(B) Be provided as initial training and then as subsequent training at least once every
two years.
(i) Require that the policy adopted under this section be made available:
(A) In the student handbook; and
(B) On the school district’s website in culturally appropriate languages that are used to
communicate effectively with parents and guardians of students of the school district, as
determined by the school district board.
(4) For the purpose of ORS 30.265 (5), any officer, employee or agent of a school district
is immune from liability for any claim for injury to or death of any person or injury to
property resulting from an act or omission made under this section if the act or omission
was reasonable and made in good faith.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Campus” means real property owned or controlled by an institution of higher edu-
cation that is accessed by students of the institution of higher education on a regular basis,
as identified by the governing board of the institution of higher education.
(b) “Federal immigration authority” has the meaning given that term in ORS 180.805.
(c) “Governing board” means:
Enrolled House Bill 4079 (HB 4079-A) Page 2

(A) The governing board of a public university listed in ORS 352.002.
(B) The board of education of a community college district.
(C) The Oregon Health and Science University Board of Directors.
(d) “Immigration enforcement” has the meaning given that term in ORS 181A.822.
(e) “Institution of higher education” means a public university listed in ORS 352.002, a
community college operated under ORS chapter 341 or the Oregon Health and Science Uni-
versity.
(2) Each governing board shall adopt a policy for providing notice when a federal immi-
gration authority is confirmed to have entered a campus for immigration enforcement. The
policy must be consistent with applicable model policies published by the Attorney General
as provided by ORS 180.810.
(3) The policy adopted under this section must:
(a) Identify at least one administrator for the institution of higher education, or at least
one designee of the administrator, who shall be designated to:
(A) Confirm that a federal immigration authority has entered the campus for immi-
gration enforcement; and
(B) Provide notice when a federal immigration authority is confirmed to have entered the
campus for immigration enforcement.
(b) Identify the property that is considered the campus for the purpose of a notice.
(c) Require that, unless otherwise prohibited by law or court order, reasonable efforts
are made to provide notice to a student when the institution of higher education has pro-
vided information related to the student to a federal immigration authority.
(d) Require that notice that a federal immigration authority is confirmed to be on cam-
pus is provided to:
(A) Students enrolled in the institution of higher education at the campus where the
federal immigration authority is confirmed to be on campus for immigration enforcement;
and
(B) Employees of the campus of the institution of higher education where the federal
immigration authority is confirmed to be on campus for immigration enforcement.
(e) Specify the contents and delivery requirements of the notice required under para-
graph (d) of this subsection, including the requirements that the notice:
(A) Must include at least the following information:
(i) The general location of the federal immigration authority; and
(ii) Whether classes or campus operations are affected by the presence of the federal
immigration authority.
(B) May not disclose any of the following information:
(i) Personally identifiable information; or
(ii) Other information that may not be legally disclosed.
(C) May not disclose information when the disclosure:
(i) May threaten the health or safety of the students or employees of the institution of
higher education; or
(ii) Is prohibited by a court order.
(D) Must be provided as expediently as possible by existing methods used for providing
electronic communications.
(f) Ensure compliance with ORS 180.805 and 181A.826 and any policies adopted based on
a model policy published as provided by ORS 180.810.
(g) Require that annual training is provided to any person identified or designated as
provided by paragraph (a) of this subsection. The training must, at a minimum, include:
(A) Information on the requirements of this section and on any applicable model policies
published by the Attorney General under ORS 180.810.
(B) Initial training, followed by subsequent training at least once every two years.
(h) Require that the policy adopted under this section be made available:
Enrolled House Bill 4079 (HB 4079-A) Page 3

(A) On the websites of the institution of higher education in any languages that are
regularly used to communicate effectively with the students of the campus, as determined
by the governing board; and
(B) Any other locations where the institution of higher education provides information
about immigration or emergencies.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3)(d) of this section, notice is not required to be provided
when a federal immigration authority has entered campus for the purpose of accompanying
a patient whom the federal immigration authority has brought to the campus for the purpose
of receiving medical care or treatment.
(5) For the purpose of ORS 30.265 (5), any officer, employee or agent of an institution of
higher education is immune from liability for any claim for injury to or death of any person
or injury to property resulting from an act or omission made under this section if the act
or omission was reasonable and made in good faith.
SECTION 3. No later than October 1, 2026, the Higher Education Coordinating Commis-
sion shall submit to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to education
a report that summarizes for each institution of higher education the real property that has
been identified by the governing board of the institution of higher education as a campus for
the purpose of section 2 of this 2026 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2026 Act takes effect on September 30, 2026.
Passed by House February 17, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate March 2, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4079 (HB 4079-A) Page 4